Hawaii statutes.
[CHAPTER
398A]

LEAVE OF
ABSENCE FOR ORGAN, BONE MARROW, OR

PERIPHERAL
BLOOD STEM CELL DONATION

Section

398A-1 Definitions

398A-2 Inapplicability

398A-3 Leave requirement

398A-4 Restoration of employment

398A-5 Employee rights

398A-6 Civil action

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next